Massachusetts, session 194th, H5126.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 87A of chapter 276 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following 4
paragraphs:-
The court may, at any time or upon motion of a party, order a substance abuse assessment
of a person on probation and request probation provide a report on the person’s substance use
history, treatment needs and prior or current efforts to seek treatment to use as an aid in
determining whether the person has an alcohol or substance use disorder and needs treatment.
If, after evaluation, the court determines the person to have an alcohol or substance use
disorder, the person may be ordered to engage in a treatment plan or protocol determined by the
court to match their treatment needs which may include treatment: (i) with a mental health clinic
or alcohol or substance use disorder program licensed by the department of public health under
chapters 17, 111, 111B, or 111E; (ii) with a behavioral, alcohol use disorder, substance use
disorder, or mental health professional who is licensed under chapters 111J and 112 and
of 2

accredited or certified to provide services consistent with law; (iii) with a primary care provider
or mental health care provider prescribing medication for alcohol or substance use disorder; or
(iv) that aligns with evidence-based practices described in the American Society of Addiction
Medicine or the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration. A court shall,
when monitoring or modifying the person’s conditions of probation, review and consider an
attestation by the treatment provider of the person’s engagement in such treatment plan or
protocol.
The court shall, after a positive drug or alcohol test or other indicator of relapse occurs,
review and consider an attestation of the treatment provider that the person: (i) is sufficiently
engaged in, or taking reasonable effort to engage in, a treatment plan or protocol to meet its
requirements for participation; (ii) is switching treatment plans or protocols at the direction of the
court or of a treatment provider;; or (iii) has completed a treatment plan or protocol and remains
in compliance with all other conditions of probation.
If a person who has completed a treatment plan or protocol and remains subject to
conditions of probation tests positive for drugs or alcohol or exhibits any other indicator of
relapse, the court may reconsider the person’s treatment needs and order further treatment
consistent with this section.
Nothing included herein shall limit the court’s ability to employ graduated probation
sanctions to enhance public safety outcomes for probationers and pretrial defendants who remain
in community settings.
of 2